Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2120.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The state board of regents is hereby authorized and
empowered, for and on behalf of Kansas state university veterinary
medical center, to sell and convey all of the rights, title and interest
subject to all easements and appurtenances in the following described
real estate, located at 9706 Mockingbird Drive, Omaha, Douglas
county, Nebraska, and further described as:
A part of Lot 555, in Mockingbird Hills West, an addition to the
City of Omaha, as surveyed, platted and recorded in Douglas County,
Nebraska, (sometimes referred to as Parcel 15A), being more
particularly described as follows:
Commencing at the Southeast property corner of Lot 555; thence
South 89°17'33" West (assumed bearing), on the South line of said Lot
555, (said line also being the Northerly right-of-way line of
Mockingbird Drive), a distance of 706.00 feet, to the Point of
Beginning; thence continuing along said South line of Lot 555, a
distance of 4.64 feet, to a point of curvature, thence Northwesterly
along a 932.78 foot radius curve to the right, an arc distance of 206.80
feet; thence North 00°42'27" West, a distance of 216.72 feet; thence
Nort 89°17'33" East, a distance of 209.75 feet; thence South 00°42'27"
East, a distance of 239.56 feet, to the point of beginning;
Together with non-exclusive easement rights reserved in instrument
dated October 29, 1981 and recorded October 30, 1981 in Book 1678 at
Page 35 of the Deed Records of Douglas County, Nebraska.
(b) Conveyance of such rights, title and interest in such real estate
shall be executed in the name of the state board of regents by its
chairperson and executive officer. All proceeds from the sale and
conveyance thereof shall be deposited in the restricted fees fund (368-
00-2590-5530) of Kansas state university veterinary medical center.
(c) No conveyance of real estate authorized by this section shall be
made or accepted by the state board of regents until the deeds, titles and
conveyances have been reviewed and approved by the attorney general.
In the event that the state board of regents determines that the legal
description of the real estate described in this section is incorrect, the
state board of regents may convey the property utilizing the correct
legal description, but the deed conveying the property shall be subject
to the approval of the attorney general. The conveyance authorized by
this section shall not be subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 75-6609,
and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. (a) The state board of regents is hereby authorized and
empowered, for and on behalf of Kansas state university, to sell and
convey all of the rights, title and interest subject to all easements and
appurtenances in the following described real estate, commonly known
as the Unger complex, located in the city of Manhattan, Riley county,
Kansas:
(1) A TRACT OF LAND LOCATED IN THE NORTHWEST
QUARTER OF SECTION 13, TOWNSHIP 10 SOUTH, RANGE 7
EAST OF THE 6TH P.M., IN THE CITY OF MANHATTAN, RILEY
COUNTY, KANSAS, MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED BY
BRIAN J. WESTBERG, PS 1708, ON FEBRUARY 5, 2025, AS
FOLLOWS:
COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID
SECTION 13; THENCE ALONG THE NORTH LINE OF THE
NORTHWEST QUARTER OF SAID SECTION 13
N. 88°29'54" E. 1752.92 FEET TO A NORTHEAST CORNER OF
BELLEHAVEN ADDITION, A SUBDIVISION IN THE CITY OF
MANHATTAN, BEING 25' NORTH OF THE NORTHEAST
CORNER OF LOT 20 OF SAID BELLEHAVEN ADDITION;
THENCE ALONG AN EASTERLY LINE OF SAID BELLEHAVEN

HOUSE BILL No. 2120—page 2
ADDITION
S. 00°05'53" E. 25.01 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AT
THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF LOT 20 OF SAID BELLEHAVEN
ADDITION; THENCE CONTINUING
S. 00°05'53" E. 420.64 FEET TO THE NORTHWEST CORNER
OF LOT 30 OF SAID BELLEHAVEN ADDITION; THENCE ALONG
THE NORTHERLY LINE OF LOTS 30-34 OF SAID BELLEHAVEN
ADDITION
N. 88°25'22" E. 450.00 FEET TO THE NORTHEAST CORNER
OF LOT 34 OF SAID BELLEHAVEN ADDITION; THENCE
N. 52°53'41" E. 234.32 FEET TO THE WESTERLY RIGHT OF
WAY LINE OF ANDERSON AVENUE (PREVIOUSLY U.S.
HIGHWAY 24) A PUBLIC STREET IN THE CITY OF
MANHATTAN; THENCE ALONG THE WESTERLY RIGHT OF
WAY LINE OF SAID ANDERSON AVENUE
N. 37°06'19" W. 348.69 FEET TO THE SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY
LINE OF TIMBERLANE DRIVE, A PUBLIC STREET IN THE CITY
OF MANHATTAN DEDICATED BY THE HARLINGS OWNER
CERTIFICATE ON THE FINAL PLAT OF TIMBERLANE
ADDITION TO MANHATTAN; THENCE ALONG SOUTH RIGHT
OF WAY LINE OF SAID TIMBERLANE DRIVE
S. 88°29'54" W. 427.21 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING,
CONTAINING 5.17 ACRES; and
(2) LOTS 35, 36, AND 37, BELLEHAVEN ADDITION TO THE
CITY OF MANHATTAN, RILEY COUNTY, KANSAS
AND;
A TRACT OF LAND LOCATED IN THE NORTHWEST
QUARTER OF SECTION 13, TOWNSHIP 10 SOUTH, RANGE 7
EAST OF THE 6TH P.M., IN THE CITY OF MANHATTAN, RILEY
COUNTY, KANSAS, MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED BY
BRIAN J. WESTBERG, PS 1708, ON FEBRUARY 5, 2025, AS
FOLLOWS:
BEGINNING AT THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF LOT 37,
BELLEHAVEN ADDITION TO THE CITY OF MANHATTAN;
THENCE ALONG THE NORTH LINE OF LOTS 37, 36, AND 35 OF
SAID BELLEHAVEN ADDITION
S. 88°25'22" W. 287.92 FEET; THENCE
N. 52°53'41" E. 234.32 FEET TO THE WESTERLY RIGHT OF
WAY LINE OF ANDERSON AVENUE (PREVIOUSLY U.S.
HIGHWAY 24), A PUBLIC STREET IN THE CITY OF
MANHATTAN; THENCE ALONG THE WESTERLY RIGHT OF
WAY LINE OF SAID ANDERSON AVENUE
S. 37°06'19" E. 167.31 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING,
CONTAINING 0.45 ACRES
THE ABOVE-DESCRIBED TRACT CONTAINS 1.37 ACRES.
(b) Conveyance of such rights, title and interest in such real estate
shall be executed in the name of the state board of regents by its
chairperson and executive officer. All proceeds from the sale and
conveyance thereof shall be deposited in the restricted fees fund (367-
00-2520-2080) of Kansas state university.

HOUSE BILL No. 2120—page 3
(c) No conveyance of real estate authorized by this section shall be
made or accepted by the state board of regents until the deeds, titles and
conveyances have been reviewed and approved by the attorney general.
In the event that the state board of regents determines that the legal
description of the real estate described in this section is incorrect, the
state board of regents may convey the property utilizing the correct
legal description, but the deed conveying the property shall be subject
to the approval of the attorney general. The conveyance authorized by
this section shall not be subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 75-6609,
and amendments thereto.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the House, and passed
that body
HOUSE concurred in
SENATE amendments
__________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
______________________________________________________________________________
Governor.